New Mexico, session 2026, SB201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the cultural affairs department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to support the operation of rural libraries. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233062.1